test/tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/fstspeller-gt-norm-yamls/CmpNP-tests_fstspeller-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  CmpNP/Suff tests:
    lohka+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom                : ~lohka  # +CmpNP/Suff converted to a flag that should block this analysis
    lohkka+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Acc               :  lohka
    lohkka+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Gen               :  lohka
    lohkka+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Gen+Use/NG+Allegro:  lohka

    lohka+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Acc                : ~loga   # +CmpNP/Suff converted to the flag sequence @R.CmpOnly.TRUE@" @P.CmpLast.TRUE@
    lohka+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Gen                : ~loga   # +CmpNP/Suff converted to the flag sequence @R.CmpOnly.TRUE@" @P.CmpLast.TRUE@
    lohka+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Gen+Use/NG+Allegro : ~loga   # +CmpNP/Suff converted to the flag sequence @R.CmpOnly.TRUE@" @P.CmpLast.TRUE@
    lohkat+V+Imprt+ConNeg         :  loga
    lohkat+V+Imprt+Sg2            :  loga
    lohkat+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg       :  loga
    lohkat+V+VGen                 :  loga

    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lohka+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom                : viessolohka # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lohkka+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Acc               : viessolohka
    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lohkka+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Gen               : viessolohka
    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lohkka+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Gen+Use/NG+Allegro: viessolohka

    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lohka+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Acc                : viessologa  # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lohka+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Gen                : viessologa  # +CmpNP/Suff
    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lohka+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Gen+Use/NG+Allegro : viessologa  # +CmpNP/Suff
    
    lohka+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Cmp/SgNom+N+Sg+Nom: ~lohkaviessu # +CmpNP/Last
    loga+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Cmp/SgNom+N+Sg+Nom: ~lohkaviessu # +CmpNP/Last
    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lohka+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom+Cmp#gáica+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Sg+Nom: ~viessolohkagáica # +CmpNP/Last

  CmpNP/Last tests:
    lávda+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom: lávda       # +CmpNP/Last - denne skal vera ok
    guolgaduhkku+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom: guolgaduhkku       # +CmpNP/Last - denne skal vera ok
    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG+Cmp#lávda+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom: viesulávda # +CmpNP/Last
    stohpu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG+Cmp#guolgaduhkku+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom: stobuguolgaduhkku # +CmpNP/Last
    lávda+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Cmp/SgNom+N+Sg+Nom: ~lávdaviessu # +CmpNP/Last
    guolgaduhkku+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#stohpu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Cmp/SgNom+N+Sg+Nom: ~guolgaduhkustohpu # +CmpNP/Last
    viessu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lávda+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom+Cmp#gáica+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Sg+Nom: ~viessolávdagáica # +CmpNP/Last
    stohpu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#guolgaduhkku+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom+Cmp#vearrát+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom: ~stohpoguolgaduhkkovearrát # +CmpNP/Last

  CmpNP/First tests:
    EU-direktiiva+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom: EU-direktiiva       # +CmpNP/First - denne skal vera ok
    mástorándi+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#EU-direktiiva+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom: ~mástorándeEU-direktiiva # +CmpNP/First
    mástorándi+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp-#EU-direktiiva+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom: ~mástoránde-EU-direktiiva # +CmpNP/First
    EU-direktiiva+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#mástorándi+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom: EU-direktiivamástorándi # +CmpNP/First
    mástorándi+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#EU-direktiiva+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom#gáica+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Sg+Nom: ~mástorándeEU-direktiivagáica # +CmpNP/First
    mástorándi+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR#EU-direktiiva+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom#gáica+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Sg+Nom: ~mástoránde-EU-direktiivagáica # +CmpNP/First
    
    várá+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom: várá       # +CmpNP/First - denne skal vera ok
    várá+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#biigá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: várábiigán # +CmpNP/First
    biigá+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#várá+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom: ~biigávárá # +CmpNP/First

  CmpNP/None tests:
    ráddi+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom: ráddi       # +CmpNP/None - denne skal vera ok
    ráddi+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp#seaidni+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Ill: ~ráddeseaidnái       # +CmpNP/None
    seaidni+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp#ráddi+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Ill: ~seaidneráddái       # +CmpNP/None
    seaidni+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp#ráddi+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp#gorut+N+Sg+Nom: ~seaidneráddegorut # +CmpNP/None

    ovccičuođis+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom: ovccičuođis       # +CmpNP/None - denne skal vera ok
    ovccičuođis+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp#osttus+CmpN/SgN+N+Pl+Nom: ~ovccičuođesostosat       # +CmpNP/None
    osttus+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp#ovccičuođis+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Ill: ~osttusovccičuođis       # +CmpNP/None
    osttus+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp#ovccičuođes+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp#osolaš+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Nom: ~osttusovccičuođesosolaš # +CmpNP/None

  CmpNP/Pref tests:
    cirggangeaš+N: ~cirggangeaš  # +CmpNP/Pref converted to a flag that should block this analysis - CmpNP/Pref removed, instead handled by lexicon FirstComponent.
    cirggangeaš+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp#seaidni+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Ill: cirggangeašseaidnái # +CmpNP/Pref
    cirggangeaš+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#seaidni+CmpN/SgN+N+Sg+Ill: cirggangeaš-seaidnái # +CmpNP/Pref
    seaidni+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp#cirggangeaš+N: ~seaidnecirggangeaš # +CmpNP/Pref

    portugála+N: ~portugála  # +CmpNP/Pref converted to a flag that should block this analysis
    portugála+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp#metálla+CmpN/SgN+N+G3+Sg+Acc: portugálametálla # +CmpNP/Pref
    portugála+CmpN/SgN+N+Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#metálla+CmpN/SgN+N+G3+Sg+Acc: portugála-metálla # +CmpNP/Pref
    metálla+CmpN/SgN+N+G3+Cmp#portugála+CmpN/SgN+N: ~metállaportugála # +CmpNP/Pref
